lexd/ru_lemmas/n.lexd
анӡемак<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
инӡем<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
инӡемак<n>:годовалая_овечка<n>
анӡӣц<n>:глиняный_сосуд<n>
анӡу̊м<n>:годовалый_барашек<n>
анӡу̊мак<n>:годовалый_барашек<n>
анӡу̊мӣҷ<n>:годовалый_барашек<n>
инӡу̊мӣҷ<n>:годовалый_барашек<n>
анҷāн<n>:тальниковая_петля<n>
инҷāн<n>:тальниковая_петля<n>
анҷӣвд<n>:ряд<n>
анчӣр<n>:инжир<n>
анчӣр<n>:имя_собств_жен_анчр<n>
анчӣрзор<n>:роща_смоковниц<n>
апарāт<n>:аппарат<n>
апрел<n>:апрель<n>
аптек<n>:аптека<n>
араб<n>:араб<n>
араб-шанос<n>:арабист<n>
араб-шинос<n>:арабист<n>
арāйи<n>:трехдневие<n>
арайи<n>:трехдневие<n>
арāй-торā<n>:мелкие_бусы_в_три_нити<n>
арай-торā<n>:мелкие_бусы_в_три_нити<n>
аракат<n>:движение<n>
аракат<n>:сила<n>
арам<n>:гарем<n>
к-арам<n>:гарем<n>
ар-ар<n>:пирамидальный_тополь<n>
ар-ҳар<n>:пирамидальный_тополь<n>
ар-ар<n>:крик_осла<n>
арасот<n>:снегопад<n>
арақ-ароқи<n>:испарина<n>
арақ-қароқи<n>:испарина<n>
арāқ<n>:пот<n>
арақ<n>:пот<n>
арāқ<n>:водка<n>
арақ<n>:водка<n>
арбоб<n>:помощник_сельского_старосты<n>
арбоб-арбобак<n>:название_детской_игры<n>
арwо<n>:дух_предков<n>
арwогу̊н<n>:дух_предков<n>
арwойен<n>:дух_предков<n>
арwо<n>:память_об_умершем<n>
арwогу̊н<n>:память_об_умершем<n>
арwойен<n>:память_об_умершем<n>
арwогӣрак<n>:небольшой_подарок_родственнику<n>
аргаwул<n>:железная_деталь_недоуздка<n>
арδāн<n>:главная_борозда<n>
арδêwҷ<n>:кора_древесных_ветвей<n>
арδêwҷак<n>:кора_древесных_ветвей<n>
арδиwêг<n>:куча_хвороста<n>
арδӣн<n>:марена<n>
арδу̊н<n>:очаг<n>
арδу̊нак<n>:очажок<n>
арδу̊н-кабоб<n>:жаркое<n>
арδу̊н-х̌ед<n>:облупившаяся_глина<n>
арδӯнҷак<n>:красноватая_сыпь<n>
арδӯнҷ<n>:мельничный_ковш<n>
арδӯнҷак<n>:мельничный_ковш<n>
арθӣм<n>:снежная_пыль<n>
арз<n>:заявление<n>
арзах̌<n>:способность<n>
арзих̌<n>:способность<n>
арзу̊ни<n>:дешевизна<n>
арзу̊ни<n>:изобилие<n>
арӣжм<n>:сажа<n>
арӣзм<n>:сажа<n>
арӣзā<n>:заявление<n>
арӣза-δêд<n>:подача_заявлений<n>
арӣр<n>:легкая_шелковая_ткань<n>
арӣр<n>:имя_собств_жен_арр<n>
арйағ<n>:тальниковая_завязка<n>
арйағеҷ<n>:тальниковый_прут_для_завязки_арйа<n>
арк<n>:арк<n>
армани<n>:армянин<n>
армон<n>:желание<n>
арму̊н<n>:желание<n>
а-ро<n>:брат<n>
а-родāр<n>:брат<n>
аробадор<n>:возчик<n>
ароба-ках̌<n>:арбакеш<n>
аробā<n>:арба<n>
а-родāре<n>:эй<n>
а-роде<n>:эй<n>
а-рое<n>:эй<n>
а-ройе<n>:эй<n>
аррабиц<n>:пилка<n>
аррадор<n>:пильщик<n>
арра-δāδӣҷ<n>:пильщик<n>
арра-ках̌<n>:пильщик<n>
аррас<n>:крик<n>
арраст<n>:крик<n>
арра-тāжӣҷ<n>:пильщик<n>
арā<n>:пила<n>
аррā<n>:пила<n>
артел<n>:артель<n>
артӣст<n>:артист<n>
артӣсти<n>:артистическая_деятельность<n>
артӣстка<n>:артистка<n>
ару̊манд<n>:мертвечина<n>
ару̊ми<n>:не_годное_в_пищу<n>
ару̊мкори<n>:испорченная_работа<n>
ару̊м-рӯзи<n>:случайно_найденная_вещь<n>
ару̊м-рӯзи<n>:счастливец<n>
ару̊м-рӯзиги<n>:проживание_на_чужой_счет<n>
ару̊мхури<n>:употребление_поганой_пищи<n>
ару̊мхури<n>:тунеядство<n>
арф<n>:буква<n>
арӯф<n>:буква<n>
урӯф<n>:буква<n>
арф<n>:алфавит<n>
арӯф<n>:алфавит<n>
урӯф<n>:алфавит<n>
архийалог<n>:археолог<n>
архийолог<n>:археолог<n>
архийалог<n>:археология<n>
архийолог<n>:археология<n>
архийалогийа<n>:археология<n>
архийологийа<n>:археология<n>
архитектур<n>:архитектор<n>
архӣв<n>:архив<n>
арш<n>:поднебесье<n>
арғанҷор<n>:плодовое_дерево_из_породы_сливовых<n>
арғанҷор<n>:плод_этого_дерева<n>
арғунд<n>:баран<n>
арқā<n>:верхняя_часть_спины<n>
асаwул<n>:распорядитель_на_свадьбе<n>
йасаwул<n>:распорядитель_на_свадьбе<n>
асаwули<n>:обязанности_распорядителя_на_свадьбе<n>
йасаwули<n>:обязанности_распорядителя_на_свадьбе<n>
асал<n>:мед<n>
асал<n>:имя_собств_жен_или_компонент_муж_и_жен_имени<n>
асал-цивӣнц<n>:пчела<n>
асбоб<n>:инструмент<n>
асбоб<n>:седло<n>
ас-wи-сāри<n>:перед_рассветом<n>
ас-wи-сару̊ни<n>:перед_рассветом<n>
асгар<n>:воин<n>
аскар<n>:воин<n>
асгари<n>:военная_служба<n>
аскари<n>:военная_служба<n>
асгӣр<n>:крайний_бык_в_упряжке<n>
асӣ<n>:этот_год<n>
асӣδ<n>:этот_год<n>
асӣд<n>:этот_год<n>
к-асӣδ<n>:этот_год<n>
к-асӣд<n>:этот_год<n>
асӣδнӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣδӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣдинҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣдну̊нҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣднӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣдӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
к-асӣδну̊нҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
к-асӣδу̊нҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
к-асӣдну̊нҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
к-асӣднӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
к-асӣдӣнҷ<n>:этого_года<n>
асӣр<n>:пленник<n>
йасӣр<n>:пленник<n>
аслиā<n>:оружие<n>
аслийā<n>:оружие<n>
аслиҳā<n>:оружие<n>
асли-марҷу̊н<n>:красные_бусы_из_настоящего_коралла<n>
асно<n>:время<n>
асоб<n>:счет<n>
исоб<n>:счет<n>
йисоб<n>:счет<n>
асоб<n>:арифметика<n>
исоб<n>:арифметика<n>
йисоб<n>:арифметика<n>
асос<n>:основа<n>
асос<n>:причина<n>
асп<n>:лошадь<n>
аср<n>:век<n>
асри<n>:век<n>
аср<n>:вечерние_сумерки<n>
асри<n>:вечерние_сумерки<n>
а-сар-аθ<n>:снова<n>
а-сарак-аθ<n>:снова<n>
ас-сар<n>:снова<n>
ас-сарак-аθ<n>:снова<n>
астāр<n>:подкладка<n>
астиманди<n>:состояние<n>
атwор<n>:состояние<n>
атистāт<n>:аттестат<n>
атйот<n>:осторожность<n>
атйот<n>:бережливость<n>
ато<n>:дар<n>
атрад<n>:военный_гарнизон<n>
атрат<n>:военный_гарнизон<n>
атри<n>:духи<n>
атри-δāδӣҷ<n>:пользующийся_духами<n>
атроф<n>:окрестность<n>
афбуст<n>:фурункулы<n>
афгу̊н<n>:абрикосовые_косточки<n>
афдарабоду̊м<n>:двор<n>
афдарабоду̊ми<n>:двор<n>
афзол<n>:способность<n>
афйӯн<n>:опиум<n>
афйӯн-ках̌<n>:курильщик_опиума<n>
афйӯни<n>:курильщик_опиума<n>
афканā<n>:хлопоты<n>
афлақā<n>:широковатый<n>
афлотӯн<n>:платон<n>
афлоқ<n>:на_босу_ногу<n>
аформā<n>:оформление<n>
афтамубӣл<n>:автомобиль<n>
афтомубӣл<n>:автомобиль<n>
афтулмубӣл<n>:автомобиль<n>
афтулмубӣн<n>:автомобиль<n>
афтумубӣн<n>:автомобиль<n>
афтā<n>:неделя<n>
афу̊натгари<n>:хитрость<n>
афхардух<n>:дурной_задах<n>
ахор<n>:конюшня<n>
рахор<n>:конюшня<n>
ахори<n>:баран<n>
рахори<n>:баран<n>
ахта-кинӣч<n>:тот<n>
ахта-кун<n>:тот<n>
ахтаху̊нā<n>:конюшня<n>
ахтиху̊нā<n>:конюшня<n>
ах̌енӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
ашамат<n>:пышность<n>
ашар<n>:хашар<n>
ашêрӣч<n>:клеветник<n>
ашорат<n>:знак<n>
ишорат<n>:знак<n>
ағаниӡ<n>:шум<n>
ағиӡ<n>:рев<n>
ағйор<n>:соперник<n>
ағйор<n>:чуткий<n>
ағйори<n>:чутье<n>
ағйоригари<n>:чутье<n>
ағӡирд<n>:суета<n>
ағ̌дал<n>:дракон<n>
ағ̌дар<n>:дракон<n>
ағ̌дал<n>:обжора<n>
ағ̌дар<n>:обжора<n>
ақ<n>:истина<n>
ақ<n>:право<n>
ақ<n>:взнос<n>
ақ<n>:доля<n>
ақгӯй<n>:правдивый<n>
ақдор<n>:имеющий_право<n>
ақêқ<n>:сердолик<n>
ақêқат<n>:правда<n>
ақӣқат<n>:правда<n>
ақли<n>:ум<n>
ақлидори<n>:благоразумие<n>
āмақ<n>:дурак<n>
ахмақ<n>:дурак<n>
ақмақ<n>:дурак<n>
āмақгари<n>:глупость<n>
ахмақгари<n>:глупость<n>
ақмақгари<n>:глупость<n>
āмақи<n>:глупость<n>
ахмақи<n>:глупость<n>
ақмақи<n>:глупость<n>
ақоб<n>:орелбородач<n>
ақоб-гāх̌т<n>:слет<n>
ақорат<n>:ругань<n>
ақоратгар<n>:оскорбитель<n>
ақраб<n>:железная_деталь_недоуздка<n>
ақраб<n>:вор<n>
ақрор<n>:признание<n>
ақсā<n>:чих<n>
аҷал<n>:смерть<n>
аҷинā<n>:нечистая_сила<n>
аҷоибхунā<n>:музей<n>
аҷойибхунā<n>:музей<n>
āwаст<n>:возглас<n>
āwгӯст<n>:август<n>
āwозā<n>:слух<n>
оwозā<n>:слух<n>
āwол<n>:положение<n>
āwолот<n>:положение<n>
āwол-пех̌цт<n>:взаимные_расспросы_о_жизни<n>
āwол-пурси<n>:взаимные_расспросы_о_жизни<n>
āwрӯпо<n>:европа<n>
еwропа<n>:европа<n>
еwрӯпо<n>:европа<n>
āд<n>:соглашение<n>
āзо<n>:член<n>
āзо<n>:член<n>
āзоги<n>:членство<n>
āкт<n>:акт<n>
āл<n>:решение<n>
āл<n>:растворение<n>
āл-аwлод<n>:родственники<n>
āл-ат<n>:родственники<n>
āлгебра<n>:алгебра<n>
āлгибра<n>:алгебра<n>
āли<n>:население<n>
āлоху̊н<n>:отличник<n>
āлочи<n>:отличник<n>
āрмийа<n>:армия<n>
āтибор<n>:надежда<n>
етибор<n>:надежда<n>
āтибори<n>:надежда<n>
етибори<n>:надежда<n>
āту̊м<n>:атом<n>
бāбā<n>:молоко<n>
бабā<n>:молоко<n>
бабри<n>:леопард<n>
багāж<n>:багаж<n>
бад<n>:зло<n>
бадāл<n>:обмен<n>
бадал<n>:обмен<n>
бидāл<n>:обмен<n>
бадан<n>:тело<n>
бадараw<n>:и_дух_вон<n>
бадарраw<n>:и_дух_вон<n>
бадахлоқи<n>:дурное_поведение<n>
бадах̌хи<n>:житель_бадахшана<n>
бадгāп<n>:грубиян<n>
бадгап<n>:грубиян<n>
бадгāпи<n>:грубость<n>
бадгапи<n>:грубость<n>
бадгиму̊ни<n>:подозрение<n>
бадгуму̊ни<n>:подозрение<n>
баӡорδи<n>:ревность<n>
баӡоти<n>:низкое_происхождение<n>
бади<n>:зло<n>
ба-дил<n>:в_памяти<n>
бадкирдор<n>:злодей<n>
бадкирдори<n>:злодейство<n>
бадкор<n>:злодей<n>
бадкори<n>:злодейство<n>
баткори<n>:злодейство<n>
бад-лāфч<n>:губошлеп<n>
бадмаст<n>:горький_пьяница<n>
бадмасти<n>:пьянство<n>
бадмиҷози<n>:грубость<n>
бадму̊милаги<n>:грубость<n>
бадмӯ̊милаги<n>:грубость<n>
баднафци<n>:прожорливость<n>
баднози<n>:кокетство<n>
бадну̊мги<n>:дурная_слава<n>
бадну̊ми<n>:дурная_слава<n>
бадраги<n>:неблагородство<n>
бадрағā<n>:ссылка<n>
бадрақā<n>:ссылка<n>
бадрӯйги<n>:уродство<n>
бадрӯйи<n>:уродство<n>
бадсифати<n>:недоброкачественность<n>
бадсохти<n>:неуклюжесть<n>
бадсухан<n>:грубый<n>
бадсухани<n>:сквернословие<n>
бадфикри<n>:злоумышленник<n>
бадхо<n>:злоумышленник<n>
бадхойи<n>:недоброжелательство<n>
бадху̊ни<n>:неуспеваемость<n>
бадчах̌ми<n>:недружелюбие<n>
бадқāри<n>:гнев<n>
батқāри<n>:гнев<n>
бадҷāли<n>:злоба<n>
баδамак<n>:большеухая_пищуха<n>
базеби<n>:красота<n>
базм<n>:пир<n>
базмгāр<n>:затейник<n>
базмгар<n>:затейник<n>
бай<n>:цена<n>
байн<n>:промежуток<n>
байнулмилал<n>:интернационал<n>
байнулмиллал<n>:интернационал<n>
бакал<n>:телка<n>
бакс<n>:кошелек<n>
бакц<n>:кошелек<n>
баксак<n>:маленький_кошелек<n>
бакцак<n>:маленький_кошелек<n>
бал<n>:возглас<n>
балади<n>:осведомленность<n>
балан-дāлӣӡ<n>:сени<n>
баланд-дāлӣӡ<n>:сени<n>
билāн-дāлӣӡ<n>:сени<n>
билāнд-дāлӣӡ<n>:сени<n>
баланди<n>:высота<n>
билāнди<n>:высота<n>
биланди<n>:высота<n>
балафта-кори<n>:пустое<n>
билифта-кори<n>:пустое<n>
балафтā<n>:бездельник<n>
билифтā<n>:бездельник<n>
балwо<n>:скандал<n>
балку̊н<n>:балкон<n>
балнӣц<n>:больница<n>
бало<n>:нечистая_сила<n>
бало<n>:беда<n>
балогари<n>:зловредность<n>
балогари<n>:бахвальство<n>
балхи-дорх̌<n>:род_тесла_балхского_производства<n>
балхи-торх̌<n>:род_тесла_балхского_производства<n>
балшаwӣк<n>:большевик<n>
балғам<n>:мокрота<n>
балғочак<n>:щекотка<n>
балғочевак<n>:щекотка<n>
балғочефак<n>:щекотка<n>
ғалғачев<n>:щекотка<n>
ғалғачевак<n>:щекотка<n>
ба-мод-wох̌<n>:хвощ<n>
ба-мод-wох̌ак<n>:хвощ<n>
ба-мод-wох̌<n>:лебеда<n>
ба-мод-wох̌ак<n>:лебеда<n>
ба-мод-гул<n>:цветок_травы_бамод<n>
ба-мод-гулак<n>:цветок_травы_бамод<n>
банафшā<n>:примула_туркестанская<n>
банафшā<n>:банафш<n>
банг<n>:бот_конопля<n>
банг<n>:гашиш<n>
бангдунā<n>:конопляное_семя<n>
банги<n>:наркоман<n>
банг-тāжӣҷ<n>:курильщик_гашиша<n>
бандаги<n>:рабство<n>
банда-зоδ<n>:род_человеческий<n>
банда-зод<n>:род_человеческий<n>
бандак<n>:канавка<n>
бандак<n>:цепь_от_двери<n>
бандак-дāрδ<n>:ревматизм<n>
бандак-δорг<n>:деревянная_палочка_в_косяке_двери<n>
бандак-ҷой<n>:отверстие_в_косяке_двери_для_палочки<n>
бандар<n>:порт<n>
бандар<n>:граница<n>
бандар-вираwӣҷ<n>:нарушитель_границы<n>
бандар-вирағ̌ӣҷ<n>:нарушитель_границы<n>
бандар-х̌икан<n>:изменник_родины<n>
бандар-шикан<n>:изменник_родины<n>
бандā<n>:раб<n>
бандагу̊н<n>:раб<n>
бандайен<n>:раб<n>
бандā<n>:слуга<n>
бандагу̊н<n>:слуга<n>
бандайен<n>:слуга<n>
банди<n>:арестант<n>
банди<n>:арест<n>
банди-даст<n>:кисть_руки<n>
банди-ху̊нā<n>:тюрьма<n>
бан-х̌икор<n>:вывих_руки<n>
банд-х̌икор<n>:вывих_руки<n>
банчā<n>:пучок<n>
бао<n>:цена<n>
буо<n>:цена<n>
баор<n>:весна<n>
бор<n>:весна<n>
буор<n>:весна<n>
баор<n>:весной<n>
бор<n>:весной<n>
буор<n>:весной<n>
бар<n>:грудь<n>
бар<n>:склон_горы<n>
бар<n>:плод<n>
баракат<n>:изобилие<n>
баракат<n>:благословение<n>
баракат-бāх̌<n>:благопожелание<n>
баракати<n>:благосостояние<n>
барам-δêд<n>:устранение<n>
барҳам-δêд<n>:устранение<n>
бар-ба-бар<n>:в_схватке<n>
барбанд<n>:барбанд<n>
барбанд<n>:препятствие<n>
барwêзи<n>:барвазец<n>
баргах̌т<n>:возвращение<n>
бардох̌т<n>:выносливость<n>
барзанги<n>:фантастическое_чудовище<n>
барзанги<n>:громила<n>
барзийод<n>:лишний<n>
барзийот<n>:лишний<n>
барзӣн<n>:обвивание<n>
барках̌<n>:весы<n>
бармāй<n>:сверло<n>
барнêғ̌ӣҷ<n>:тот<n>
баробар-wӣз<n>:горизонтально_положенный_вьюк<n>
баробар-δорг<n>:горизонтальная_балка<n>
баробари<n>:равенство<n>
баробар-х̌āб<n>:полночь<n>
бародар<n>:брат<n>
биродар<n>:брат<n>
баромад<n>:расход<n>
барор<n>:успех<n>
барост<n>:честное_слово<n>
барости<n>:честное_слово<n>
барости<n>:правда<n>
барпогāр<n>:основатель<n>
барпо-кинӣҷ<n>:основатель<n>
барпо-кунӣҷ<n>:основатель<n>
барпо-чӣд<n>:установление<n>
